Utah statutes.
48-2e-104.   Nature, purpose, and duration of limited partnership.

(1)  A limited partnership is an entity distinct from its partners.  A limited partnership is the same entity regardless of whether its certificate states that the limited partnership is a limited liability limited partnership.

(2)  A limited partnership may have any lawful purpose, regardless of whether for profit.

(3)  A limited partnership has perpetual duration.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

